Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2139.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 72-1131 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
1131. Each unified school district shall be designated by the name and
style of "unified school district no. ______ (the number designated by the
state board of education), ____________ county (naming the home county
of the unified school district), state of Kansas," and by such name may sue
and be sued, execute contracts and hold such real and personal property as
it may acquire. Every unified school district shall possess the usual powers
of a corporation for public purposes. The board of education of every
unified school district may delegate to the superintendent of schools the
power to execute contracts on behalf of the district for the purchase of
goods and services if the value of such goods or services is $20,000
$50,000 or less.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 72-1151 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
1151. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section and K.S.A. 72-
6760b, no expenditure involving an amount greater than $20,000 $50,000
for construction, reconstruction or remodeling or for the purchase of
materials, goods or wares shall be made by the board of education of any
school district except upon sealed proposals, and to the lowest responsible
bidder.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) do not apply to expenditures by a
board of education for the purchase of:
(1) Services;
(2) products required to be purchased under the provisions of K.S.A.
75-3317 through 75-3322, and amendments thereto;
(3) educational materials directly related to curriculum and secured
by copyright;

HB 2139 2
(4) motor fuels required to provide or furnish transportation;
(5) food and foodstuffs necessary for the implementation or operation
of any child nutrition program;
(6) articles or products that are produced, manufactured or provided
by inmates under the prison-made goods act of Kansas;
(7) natural gas that will be consumed in buildings owned or operated
by the school district;
(8) materials, goods or wares required for reconstructing, remodeling,
repairing or equipping buildings when such purchase has been necessitated
by the occurrence of a loss against which the board of education has
purchased property or casualty insurance; and
(9) materials, goods or wares which that are purchased:
(A) From vendors who have entered into contracts with the state
director of purchases pursuant to state purchasing statutes for purchases by
state agencies;
(B) under the same pricing provisions established in the state
contracts, subject to agreement of the vendor to honor the state contract
prices; and
(C) under the same pricing provisions established in federal, national
or other state contracts facilitated by a federal or local governmental entity
or agency, subject to:
(i) Agreement of the vendor to honor the contract prices; and
(ii) approval by the board of education for expenditures in an amount
greater than $20,000 $50,000.
(c) Whenever the board of education of any school district lets bids
for the purchase of materials, goods or wares and bids are submitted by
bidders domiciled within the school district and by bidders domiciled
outside the school district and the low bid is submitted by a bidder
domiciled outside the school district, the school district domiciliary which
that submitted the lowest bid may be deemed the preferred bidder and
awarded the bid if:
(1) The quality, suitability and usability of the materials, goods or
wares are equal;
(2) the amount of the bid of the school district domiciliary is not more
than 1% greater than the amount of the low bid; and
(3) the school district domiciliary agrees to meet the low bid by filing
a written agreement to that effect within 72 hours after receiving
notification of being deemed the preferred bidder.
(d) The provisions of subsection (c) do not apply to expenditures for
construction, reconstruction or remodeling.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 72-1131 and 72-1151 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.